Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.128

Construction of chapter—Health carrier contracts with physical therapist assistants.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require that a health carrier defined in RCW 48.43.005 contract with a person licensed as a physical therapist assistant under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 98 s 17.]